Hawaii, session 2026, GM1212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that individuals who
donate tangible property using collection bins or receptacles
may reasonably believe that the tangible property is donated
directly to charitable organizations, and may also reasonably
believe they are entitled to a federal income tax credit
deduction for the value of the donated property.
The legislature further finds that in some cases, the
entities operating collection bins or receptacles on behalf of
the charity will pay the charity based on the weight of the
donated items received, which can be as low as two to five cents
per pound, and then resell the donated property at for-profit
retail locations. Most donors are not aware of these
arrangements between the collection bin operator and associated
charitable organizations.
The legislature also finds that existing law does not
adequately address this charitable solicitation business model.
The purpose of this Act is to:
2026-3364 HB1810 GDI HMSO
iHiniiiiiiliiliiniiniii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(1) Establish prompt payment and financial reporting
requirements for professional solicitors that sell
donated or collected non-perishable tangible property
on behalf of charitable organizations; and
(2) Prohibit professional solicitors that sell donated or
collected non-perishable tangible property from
failing to prominently disclose certain information on
any collection bin, container, or receptacle used to
receive donated or collected non-perishable tangible
property or comply with prompt payment, financial
reporting, and contract term requirements.
SECTION 2. Section 467B-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending the definition of "contribution" to read:
""Contribution" means the promise or grant of any money or
property of any kind or value, including [the] non-perishable
tangible property, or a promise to pay[—] or pledge, except
payments by members of a charitable organization for membership
fees, dues, fines, or assessments, or for services rendered to
individual members, if membership in the charitable organization
confers a bona fide right, privilege, professional standing,
2026-3364 HB1810 CDl HMSO 2
■liMMIIIHIIIM

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
honor, or other direct benefit, other than the right to vote,
elect officers, or hold offices, and except money or property
received from any governmental authority, or a grant or subsidy
from any organization exempt from taxation under section
501(c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code."
2. By amending the definition of "solicit" and
"solicitation" to read:
""Solicit" and "solicitation" mean a request directly or
indirectly for money, credit, property, financial assistance, or
thing of value on the plea or representation that the money,
credit, property, financial assistance, or thing of value, or
any portion thereof, will be used for a charitable purpose or to
benefit a charitable organization. [These terms shall include]
"Solicit" and "solicitation" includes the following:
(1) Any oral or written request;
(2) The making of any announcement to any organization for
the purpose of further dissemination, including
announcements to the press, over the radio or
television, or by telephone, telegraph, or facsimile,
concerning an appeal or campaign by or for any
charitable organization or purpose;
2026-3364 HB1810 CDl HMSO
■■imiiiimiii

Page 4
H.B. NO. ^2
C.D. 1
(3) The distribution, circulation, posting, or publishing
of any handbill, written advertisement, or other
publication that directly or by implication seeks to
obtain public support;
(4) Where the sale or offer or attempted sale, of any
advertisement, advertising space, book, card, tag,
coupon, device, magazine, membership, merchandise,
subscription, flower, ticket, candy, cookies, or other
tangible item in connection with which any appeal is
made for any charitable organization or purpose; or
where the name of any charitable organization is used
or referred to in any appeal as an inducement or
reason for making any sale; or where in connection
with any sale, any statement is made that the whole or
any part of the proceeds from any sale will be used
for any charitable purpose or to benefit any
charitable organization; and
(5) A request made through the use of receptacles for
contributions, including non-perishable tangible
property, such as honor boxes, vending machines,
wishing wells, contribution boxes, [and] novelty
2026-3364 HB1810 CDl HMSO
HilllflIiiilillIHMII

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
machines, and collection bins or containers, where a
charitable appeal is used or referred to or implied as
an inducement or reason to contribute.
A solicitation occurs whether or not the person making the
solicitation receives any contribution. However, [the -berm
shall] solicitation does not include the submission of a grant
or subsidy proposal or application to a governmental authority
or any organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code."
SECTION 3. Section 467B-2.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§467B-2.5 Professional solicitor financial reports;
contribution account[—]; disclosure; payment; charitable
organizations. (a) A professional solicitor shall file with
the attorney general a financial report for any charitable
solicitation campaign, including gross revenue from Hawaii
donors and national gross revenue and an itemization of all
expenses incurred on a form prescribed by the attorney general
no more than ninety days after the end of the solicitation
campaign and, for solicitation campaigns lasting more than one
year, within ninety days after each anniversary of the
2026-3364 HB1810 CDl HMSO

Page 6
H.B. NO. £2
C.D. 1
commencement of the solicitation campaign and within ninety days
after the end of the solicitation campaign.
(b) The attorney general may require the financial report
required by subsection (a) to be submitted electronically and
may require the use of electronic signatures. This report shall
be signed by the professional solicitor, or an authorized
officer or agent of the professional solicitor who shall certify
that the statements therein are true and correct to the best of
the solicitor's, officer's, or agent's knowledge subject to
penalties imposed by section 710-1063. If a financial report
required under this section is not filed in a timely manner,
taking into account any extension of time for filing, unless it
is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause, an initial
late filing fee of $100 shall be imposed, and an additional late
filing fee of $20 per day shall be imposed, for each day during
which the violation continues; provided that the total fee
amount imposed under this subsection shall not exceed $1,000.
The attorney general may waive all or part of the late filing
fee imposed by this subsection if there is a reasonable cause
for the failure to timely file. The professional solicitor
shall provide a copy of the financial report to the charitable
2026-3364 HB1810 CDl HMSO

Page 7 1810
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
organization to which the financial report pertains within ten
days of its submission of the report to the attorney general.
(c) A professional solicitor shall maintain during each
solicitation campaign and for [net-] no less than three years
after the completion of that campaign the following records,
which shall be available for inspection upon demand by the
attorney general:
(1) The date and amount of each contribution received and
the name and address of each contributor;
(2) The name and residence of each employee, agent, or
other person involved in the solicitation;
(3) Records of all revenue received and expenses incurred
in the course of the solicitation campaign; and
(4) The location and account number of each bank or other
financial institution account in which the
professional solicitor has deposited revenue from the
solicitation campaign.
(d) Any material change in any information filed with the
attorney general pursuant to this section shall be reported in
writing by the professional solicitor to the attorney general
[not] n^ more than seven days after the change occurs.
2026-3364 HB1810 CDl HMSO

Page 8 1810
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(e) Each contribution in the control or custody of the
professional solicitor in its entirety and within five days of
its receipt, shall be deposited in an account at a bank or other
federally insured financial institution, which shall be in the
name of the charitable organization. The charitable
organization shall maintain and administer the account and shall
have sole control of all withdrawals.
(f) If the professional solicitor, directly or indirectly,
sells donated or collected non-perishable tangible property, the
professional solicitor shall deposit the full amount owed to the
charitable organization by the professional solicitor in an
account at a bank or other federally insured financial
institution, which shall be in the name of that charitable
organization, within forty-five days after the sale.
(g) If the professional solicitor, directly or indirectly,
sells donated or collected non-perishable tangible property and
compensates a charitable organization based on the weight of
donor contributions, the professional solicitor's financial
report shall include;
(1) The amount paid by the professional solicitor to any
charitable organization during the applicable period;
2026-3364 HB1810 CDl HMSO

Page 9 1810
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(2) The gross weight of all contributions by donors to the
professional solicitor,, on behalf of each respective
charitable organization, during the applicable period;
and
(3) The dollar amount of compensation per pound or other
weight measurement paid by the professional solicitor
to each charitable organization.”
SECTION 4. Section 467B-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§467B-9 Prohibited acts. (a) No person, for the purpose
of soliciting contributions from persons in the State, shall use
the name of any other person except that of an officer,
director, or trustee of the charitable organization by or for
which contributions are solicited, without the written consent
of the other persons.
A person shall be deemed to have used the name of another
person for the purpose of soliciting contributions if the latter
person’s name is listed on any stationery, advertisement,
brochure, or correspondence in or by which a contribution is
solicited by or on behalf of a charitable organization or the
latter person's name is listed or referred to in connection with
2026-3364 HB1810 CDl HMSO
IIIIHIIMIIIHIIlim

Page 10
H.B. NO. S
C.D. 1
a request for a contribution as one who has contributed to,
sponsored, or endorsed the charitable organization or its
activities.
(b) No charitable organization, professional solicitor,
professional fundraising counsel, commercial co-venturer,
charitable fundraising platform, or platform charity soliciting
contributions shall use a name, symbol, or statement so closely
related or similar to that used by another charitable
organization or governmental agency that the use thereof would
tend to confuse or mislead the public.
(c) No person, in connection with any solicitation or
sale, shall misrepresent or mislead anyone by any manner, means,
practice, or device whatsoever, to believe that the solicitation
or sale is being conducted on behalf of a charitable
organization or that the proceeds of the solicitation or sale
will be used for charitable purposes, if that is not the fact.
(d) No professional solicitor, charitable fundraising
platform, or platform charity, and no agent, employee,
independent contractor, or other person acting on behalf of the
professional solicitor, charitable fundraising platform, or
platform charity, shall solicit in the name of or on behalf of
2026-3364 HB1810 GDI HMSO 10

Page 11
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
any charitable organization unless the charitable fundraising
platform or platform charity has obtained written consent
pursuant to section 467B-2.3(e) or:
(1) The professional solicitor has obtained the written
authorization of two officers of the organization,
which authorization shall bear the signature of the
professional solicitor and the officers of the
charitable organization and shall expressly state on
its face the period for which it is valid, which shall
not exceed one year from the date of issuance, and has
filed a copy of the written authorization with the
attorney general before the solicitation; and
(2) The professional solicitor and any person who, for
compensation, acts as an agent, employee, independent
contractor, or otherwise on behalf of the professional
solicitor, carries a copy of the authorization while
conducting solicitations, and exhibits it on request
to persons solicited or police officers or agents of
the department.
(e) No charitable organization, professional fundraising
counsel, professional solicitor, commercial co-venturer.
2026-3364 HB1810 CDl HMSO 11

Page 12
H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
charitable fundraising platform, or platform charity subject to
this chapter shall use or exploit the fact of filing any
statement, report, professional fundraising counsel contracts,
written consents, professional solicitor contracts, charitable
fundraising platform contracts, or platform charity contracts
and written consents, or other documents or information required
to be filed under this chapter or with the department so as to
lead the public to believe that the filing in any manner
constitutes an endorsement or approval by the State of the
purposes or goals for the solicitation by the charitable
organization, professional fundraising counsel, professional
solicitor, commercial co-venturer, charitable fundraising
platform, or platform charity; provided that the use of the
following statement shall not be deemed a prohibited
exploitation: "Information regarding this organization has been
filed with the State of Hawaii department of the attorney
general. Filing does not imply endorsement or approval of the
organization or the public solicitation for contributions."
(f) No person, while soliciting, shall impede or obstruct,
with the intent to physically inconvenience the general public
2026-3364 HB1810 GDI HMSO 12
■IIMIililllHilli

Page 13
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
or any member thereof in any public place or in any place open
to the public.
(g) No person shall submit for filing on behalf of any
charitable organization, professional fundraising counsel,
professional solicitor, commercial co-venturer, charitable
fundraising platform, or platform charity, any statement,
financial statement, report, attachment, or other information to
be filed with the department that contains information,
statements, or omissions that are false or misleading.
(h) No person shall solicit contributions from persons in
the State or otherwise operate in the State as a charitable
organization, an exempt charitable organization, professional
fundraising counsel, professional solicitor, commercial co­
venturer, charitable fundraising platform, or platform charity
unless the person has filed the information required by this
chapter with the department in a timely manner.
(i) No person shall aid, abet, or otherwise permit any
persons to solicit contributions from persons in the State
unless the person soliciting contributions has complied with the
requirements of this chapter.
2026-3364 HB1810 GDI HMSO 13

Page 14 1810
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(j) No person shall fail to file the information and
registration statement, annual or financial reports, and other
statements required by this chapter or fail to provide any
information demanded by the attorney general pursuant to this
chapter in a timely manner.
(k) No person shall employ in any solicitation or
collection of contributions for a charitable organization, any
device, scheme, or artifice to defraud or obtain money or
property by means of any false, deceptive, or misleading
pretense, representation, or promise.
(1) No person, in the course of any solicitation, shall
represent that funds collected will be used for a particular
charitable purpose, or particular charitable purposes, if the
funds solicited are not used for the represented purposes.
(m) No person shall receive compensation from a charitable
organization for obtaining moneys or bequests for that
charitable organization if that person has also received
compensation for advising the donor to make the donation;
provided that compensation may be received if the person obtains
the written consent of the donor to receive compensation from
the charitable organization.
2026-3364 HB1810 GDI HMSO 1
IllllllllllllllliUilllllllil

Page 15 1810
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D, 2
C.D. 1
(n) No person shall act as a professional solicitor,
charitable fundraising platform, or platform charity if the
person, any officer, any person with a controlling interest
therein, or any person the professional solicitor, charitable
fundraising platform, or platform charity employs, engages, or
procures to solicit for compensation, has been convicted by any
federal or state court of any felony, or of any misdemeanor
involving dishonesty or arising from the conduct of a
solicitation for a charitable organization or purpose.
(o) No charitable organization shall use the services of
an unregistered professional solicitor, professional fundraising
counsel, charitable fundraising platform, or platform charity.
(p) No professional solicitor that, directly or
indirectly, sells any donated or collected non-perishable
tangible property shall fail to;
(1) Prominently disclose in writing on any collection bin,
container, or receptacle used by the professional
solicitor to receive donated or collected non-
perishable tangible property that:
2026-3364 HB1810 CDl HMSO 15
iniiiiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiii

Page 16
H.B. NO. i
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(A) The collection bin, container^ or receptacle is
operated and used by a paid professional
solicitor;
(B) The professional solicitor resells the donated or
collected property at retail stores and that a
charitable organization is either paid a
percentage of the sale proceeds or an amount
based on the weight of the donated or collected
non-perishable tangible property, whichever is
applicable;
(C) Donated or collected non-perishable tangible
property is not a tax-deductible charitable
contribution under the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, if applicable;
(D) The professional solicitor is registered with the
attorney general; and
(E) The professional solicitor's registration form
and contracts with the charitable organization
benefited by the collection are available for
public inspection and copying;
2026-3364 HB1810 CDl HMSO 16

Page 17
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Provide complete and timely payment of the amount owed
to a charitable organization within forty-five days
after the sale of non-perishable tangible property;
(3) Provide complete and timely financial reports to the
charitable organization and the attorney general, as
required by this chapter; and
(4) Include in the contract with the charitable
organization the terms required by section 467B-12.5."
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026;
provided that section 3 shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
2026-3364 HB1810 CDl HMSO 17

H.B. NO 1810
X
w
d
ci
Q
ci
CM
CM
T-
APPROVED this Sth day of June , 2026

HB No. 1810, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1810, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby eertify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
66-26